Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2707
Attorney's fees; when allowed.

In any action brought under sections 60-2701 to 60-2709 the court shall award reasonable attorney's fees to the prevailing party if the prevailing party is the consumer.

Laws 1983, LB 155, § 7.